Illinois, session 104th, HB5271.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 106B-5 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/106B-5)7    Sec. 106B-5. Testimony by a victim who is a child or a 8person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 9disability or a person affected by a developmental disability.10    (a) In a proceeding in the prosecution of an offense of 11criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 12a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 13abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, aggravated battery, 14or aggravated domestic battery, trafficking in persons, 15involuntary servitude, or involuntary sexual servitude of a 16minor, a court may order that the testimony of a victim who is 17a child under the age of 18 years or a person with a moderate, 18severe, or profound intellectual disability or a person 19affected by a developmental disability be taken outside the 20courtroom and shown in the courtroom by means of a closed 21circuit television if:22        (1) the testimony is taken during the proceeding; and23        (2) the judge determines that testimony by the child   HB5271- 2 -LRB104 19029 RLC 32474 b1    victim or victim with a moderate, severe, or profound 2    intellectual disability or victim affected by a 3    developmental disability in the courtroom will result in 4    the child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 5    intellectual disability or person affected by a 6    developmental disability suffering serious emotional 7    distress such that the child or person with a moderate, 8    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 9    affected by a developmental disability cannot reasonably 10    communicate or that the child or person with a moderate, 11    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 12    affected by a developmental disability will suffer severe 13    emotional distress that is likely to cause the child or 14    person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 15    disability or person affected by a developmental 16    disability to suffer severe adverse effects.17    (b) Only the prosecuting attorney, the attorney for the 18defendant, and the judge may question the child or person with 19a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 20person affected by a developmental disability.21    (c) The operators of the closed circuit television shall 22make every effort to be unobtrusive.23    (d) Only the following persons may be in the room with the 24child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 25intellectual disability or person affected by a developmental 26disability when the child or person with a moderate, severe,   HB5271- 3 -LRB104 19029 RLC 32474 b1or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 2developmental disability testifies by closed circuit 3television:4        (1) the prosecuting attorney;5        (2) the attorney for the defendant;6        (3) the judge;7        (4) the operators of the closed circuit television 8    equipment; and9        (5) any person or persons whose presence, in the 10    opinion of the court, contributes to the well-being of the 11    child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 12    intellectual disability or person affected by a 13    developmental disability, including a person who has dealt 14    with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the 15    abuse, a parent or guardian of the child or person with a 16    moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 17    person affected by a developmental disability, and court 18    security personnel.19    (e) During the child's or person with a moderate, severe, 20or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 21developmental disability's testimony by closed circuit 22television, the defendant shall be in the courtroom and shall 23not communicate with the jury if the cause is being heard 24before a jury.25    (f) The defendant shall be allowed to communicate with the 26persons in the room where the child or person with a moderate,   HB5271- 4 -LRB104 19029 RLC 32474 b1severe, or profound intellectual disability or person affected 2by a developmental disability is testifying by any appropriate 3electronic method.4    (f-5) (Blank). There is a rebuttable presumption that the 5testimony of a victim who is a child under 13 years of age 6shall testify outside the courtroom and the child's testimony 7shall be shown in the courtroom by means of a closed circuit 8television. This presumption may be overcome if the defendant 9can prove by clear and convincing evidence that the child 10victim will not suffer severe emotional distress. 11    (f-6) Before the court permits the testimony of a victim 12outside the courtroom that is to be shown in the courtroom by 13means of a closed circuit television, the court must make a 14finding that the testimony by means of closed circuit 15television does not prejudice the defendant. 16    (g) The provisions of this Section do not apply if the 17defendant represents himself pro se.18    (h) This Section may not be interpreted to preclude, for 19purposes of identification of a defendant, the presence of 20both the victim and the defendant in the courtroom at the same 21time.22    (i) This Section applies to prosecutions pending on or 23commenced on or after the effective date of this amendatory 24Act of 1994.25    (j) For the purposes of this Section, "developmental 26disability" includes, but is not limited to, cerebral palsy,   HB5271- 5 -LRB104 19029 RLC 32474 b1epilepsy, and autism. 2    (f-7) If the court denies the State's request for the 3child victim's testimony to be taken outside of the courtroom, 4the court shall toll the speedy trial requirements under 5Section 103-5 for 30 days to allow the State to present the 6motion to the court again before trial requesting the child's 7testimony to be taken outside the courtroom by means of a 8closed-circuit television. 9(Source: P.A. 103-164, eff. 1-1-24; 104-159, eff. 1-1-26.)